src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! LEXICON GenPl_only
! +N+MFN+Inan+Pl+Gen: # ;

LEXICON мн._неод._0
+N+MFN: Indecl_Pl_inan ; ! TODO CHECK FIX Are pluralia tanta genderless?

LEXICON мн._одуш._0
+N+MFN: Indecl_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON мн._неод._[п_a]
+N+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON мн._одуш._[п_a]
+N+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;

LEXICON мн._одуш._[п_a_R]
+N+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;

LEXICON мн._неод._[п_b]
+N+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_End ;

LEXICON мн._одуш._[п_b]
+N+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_End_anim ;

LEXICON м_0
+N+Msc: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Msc: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON соб-м_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON соб-с_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON соб-ж_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON м_a
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a_косв._формы_затрудн.
+N+Msc: MSgStem_ObliquePrb ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON м_a_Nom/AccSgOnly
+N+Msc: MSgNomZ ;
+N+Msc: MSgAccZ ;

LEXICON м_a_ос_о́сья/о́сьев
+N+Msc:ос MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:о́с%^Fий аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a_од_о́дья/о́дьев
+N+Msc:од MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:о́д%^Fий аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a_оз_о́зья/о́зьев
+N+Msc:оз MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:о́з%^Fий аPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-м_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-мн._[м_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-м_a?
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlStem_gPrb ;

LEXICON соб-м_a-
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON соб-м_a-_П2
соб-м_a- ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON мн._[м_a]
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON мн._[м_a]_3
мн._[м_a] ;

LEXICON мн._от_м_a
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a_П2
м_a ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a_[П2]
м_a ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON м_a_[П2]_Р2
м_a ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a_Р2
м_a ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a_ёнок
+N+Msc:ён%^Fок MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:я́т аPlStem_zero ;

LEXICON м_a1_JPl
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_zero ;

LEXICON м_a[2]
м_a ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%> # ;

LEXICON м_a3
+N+Msc: MSgStem3 ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a_полдень
+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom:по́лдень # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:по́лдень # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:полу́дня # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc:полу́дне # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat:полу́дню # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins:полу́днем # ;
+N+Msc+Inan:полу́д%^Fень ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м_a-
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON м_a-_П2
м_a- ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a-_П2_Р2
м_a- ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a-_[П2]_Р2
м_a- ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_a-_Р2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON м_b
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON соб-м_b
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON соб-мн._[м_b]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_b_косв._формы_затрудн.
+N+Msc: MSgEnd_ObliquePrb ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_ObliquePrb ;

LEXICON м_b_ок_ы
+N+Msc:%^Fо́к MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[м_b]
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[м_b]_3
мн._[м_b] ;

LEXICON м_b_П2
м_b ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_b_[П2]
м_b ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON м_b_П2_Р2
м_b ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_b_П2_Р2_мох
:%^Fо́х м_b_П2_Р2 ;
+N+Msc:о́х MSgStem_Fac ;
:о́х MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_b_Р2
м_b ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_b1
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_b1_JPl
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_b1_ь_JPl
+N+Msc:ь MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[м_b1]
+N+Msc: аPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_b2
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_zero ;

LEXICON м_b[2]
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%> # ;

LEXICON м_c
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_c_Pauc
м_c ;
MscPauc ;

! LEXICON MscPauc
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen+Count:%>а́ # ;

LEXICON м_c_П2
м_c ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c_П2_Pauc
м_c_П2 ;
MscPauc ;

LEXICON м_c_[П2]
м_c ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON м_c_П2_Р2
м_c ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c_[П2]_Р2
м_c ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c_Р2
м_c ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c-
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON м_c-_П2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_Prb ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c-_[П2]_Р2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_Prb ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c-_Р2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_Prb ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_c1_П2
м_c1 ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1_П2_перёд
+N+Msc:ёд MSgNomZ ;
+N+Msc:ёд MSgAccZ ;
+N+Msc:ед MSgObliqStem ;
+N+Msc:ёд аPlEnd ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1_[П2]
м_c1 ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON м_c1_П2_Р2
м_c1 ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1_[П2]_Р2
м_c1 ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan_Fac ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1_Р2
м_c1 ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c1-
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON м_c1-_Р2
м_c1- ;
MscGen2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c12_П2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd_zero ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_c2
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_zero ;

LEXICON м_c[2]
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%> # ;

LEXICON м_c3
+N+Msc: MSgStem3 ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_d1_JPl
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_d1_ь_JPl
+N+Msc:ь MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_d1_К_ЧЬ
+N+Msc:к MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:ч%^Fей аPlStem ;

LEXICON м_d1_П2_JPl
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlStem ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_d1_П2_К_ЧЬ
+N+Msc:к MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc:ч%^Fий аPlStem ;
+N:к MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_d2
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_zero ;

LEXICON м_e
+N+Msc: MSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON м_e_П2
м_e ;
+N: MscLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON м_e_П2_год
:го́д м_e_П2 ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom+Fac:года́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen+Count:ле́т # ;

LEXICON м_e2_волос
+N+Msc:ос MSgStem ;
+N+Msc:ос ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Msc:ос ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́с # ;
+N+Msc:ос PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[м_e]
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON м_f
+N+Msc: MSgEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON м_8b ! путь
+N+Msc+Inan: FьSgEnd_MostCases ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins:%>о́м # ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON м_[ж_a]
+N+Msc: FSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м-ж_[ж_a]_6
м_[ж_a] ;
ж_a ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>о # ;

LEXICON м_[мс_a]
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_a_Msc_inan ;
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON м_[п_a]
+N+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem ;
+N+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON соб-м_[п_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON м_[п_a/c']
м_[п_a] ;

LEXICON м_[п_a1]
м_[п_a] ;

LEXICON м_[п_as~]
м_[п_a] ;

LEXICON м_[с_a1]
+N+Msc: NSgStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON м_[с_a1]_5
м_[с_a1] ;

LEXICON м_[с_a[1]]
+N+Msc: NSgStem ;
+N+Msc: аPlStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_Fac ;

LEXICON м_[п_b/c']
м_[п_b] ;

LEXICON м_[п_b?]
м_[п_b] ;

LEXICON м_[п_b]
+N+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_End ;
+N+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_End ;

LEXICON мо_0
+N+Msc: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Msc: Indecl_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON соб-мо_0_о/е
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Pl_anim ;
:%> Patronymic_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON соб-мо_0_V
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Pl_anim ;
е:е Patronymic_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON соб-мо_0_C
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Indecl_Pl_anim ;
о:%>о Patronymic_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON мо_a
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
о:о Patronymic_stem ;
о: Patronymic_ыч ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a_VEL
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
о:о Patronymic_stem ;
о: Patronymic_ич ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a_HUSH
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
е:е Patronymic_stem ;
е: Patronymic_ич ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a_й
й+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:й MSgStem_anim ;
й+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:й ыPlStem_anim ;
е:е Patronymic_stem ;
е: Patronymic_ич ;
