src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
гороно:го̀роно́ м_0 ;
путь:пу́ть м_8b "weight: 5.488826847477922" ;
ветряга:ветря́га м_[ж_a] ;
дымина:дыми́на м-ж_[ж_a]_6 ;
стечкин:сте́чкин м_[мс_a] ;
зелёный:зелён м_[п_a/c'] ;
лабиальный:лабиа́ль%^Fен м_[п_a] ;
ртище:рти́ще м_[с_a1] ;
электротрактор:элѐктротра́ктор м_a ;
блокпост:бло̀кпо́ст м_a_[П2] "weight: 3.661061027625043" ;
сок:со́к м_a_[П2]_Р2 "weight: 4.546431010911868" ;
яр:я́р м_a_П2 "weight: 3.768600539255188" ;
цемент:цеме́нт м_a_Р2 "weight: 3.9033737220090794" ;
каюк:каю́к м_a_косв._формы_затрудн. "weight: 3.4764302975773074" ;
ком:ко́м м_a1_JPl "weight: 4.084824250004303" ;
колос:ко́л м_a_ос_о́сья/о́сьев ;
повод:по́в м_a_од_о́дья/о́дьев "weight: 5.07219639463613" ;
полоз:по́л м_a_оз_о́зья/о́зьев "weight: 3.5098410737385297" ;
электрон-вольт:электро̀н-во́льт м_a2 ;
чий:чи́й м_a3 "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
вебер:ве́бер м_a[2] ;
штапель:шта́пель м_a- ;
пух:пу́х м_a-_[П2]_Р2 "weight: 4.1381059171253884" ;
быт:бы́т м_a-_П2 "weight: 4.38902977605823" ;
пыл:пы́л м_a-_П2_Р2 "weight: 3.8725247825221016" ;
мусор:му́сор м_a-_Р2 "weight: 4.433402588760065" ;
чебрец:чебре́ц м_b ;
будыль:буды́л м_b1_ь_JPl ;
уголок:угол%^Fо́к м_b_[П2] "weight: 4.5859596748949665" ;
лёд:ль%^Fёд м_b_П2_Р2 ;
мох:м м_b_П2_Р2_мох "weight: 4.108077838464097" ;
рот:р%^Fо́т м_b_П2 "weight: 5.043403838204514" ;
первачок:перва́ч%^Fо́к м_b_Р2 ;
носок:нос%^Fо́к м_b_косв._формы_затрудн. "weight: 4.580414385701557" ;
цветок:цве́т м_b_ок_ы "weight: 5.129181829402603" ;
обшлаг:обшла́г м_b1 "weight: 3.3648483817939754" ;
чулок:чул%^Fо́к м_b2 "weight: 4.209217058787993" ;
носок:нос%^Fо́к м_b[2] "weight: 4.580414385701557" ;
шар:ша́р м_c_Pauc "weight: 4.735858564580549" ; ! For 'sphere' the paucal form is not used.
шрифт:шри́фт м_c "weight: 3.74508338472869" ;
кий:ки́й м_c3 "weight: 4.136209598773774" ;
суп:су́п м_c_[П2]_Р2 "weight: 4.613305284028811" ;
распредвал:распрѐдва́л м_c_[П2] ;
ряд:ря́д м_c_П2_Pauc "weight: 5.716197529279823" ;
пот:по́т м_c_П2_Р2 "weight: 4.733383090525823" ;
смотр:смо́тр м_c_П2 "weight: 3.4676599491383264" ;
квас:ква́с м_c_Р2 "weight: 3.926052726495175" ;
кавкорпус:кавко́рпус м_c[2] ;
вензель:ве́нзель м_c1 "weight: 3.2474040540085505" ;
стог:сто́г м_c1_[П2] "weight: 3.730820106903394" ;
мех:ме́х м_c1_[П2]_Р2 "weight: 4.226794572491336" ;
снег:сне́г м_c1_П2_Р2 "weight: 5.35027509060771" ; ! [поэтич._также_без_П2]
ток:то́к м_c1_П2 "weight: 4.584608177399618" ;
перёд:пе́р м_c1_П2_перёд ;
голос:го́лос м_c1_Р2 "weight: 5.799934152564431" ;
глаз:гла́з м_c12_П2 "weight: 6.122982560197048" ;
гуляйгород:гуля̀йго́род м_c1- ;
лес:ле́с м_c1-_Р2 "weight: 5.520208046378147" ;
раз:ра́з м_c2 "weight: 6.148276265504455" ;
полупар:полупа́р м_c- ;
мел:ме́л м_c-_[П2]_Р2 "weight: 4.097819414771611" ;
пах:па́х м_c-_П2 "weight: 3.8233384566137216" ;
жар:жа́р м_c-_Р2 "weight: 4.7128024728875255" ;
будыль:буды́л м_d1_ь_JPl ;
сук:су́ м_d1_К_ЧЬ "weight: 4.4204285142819515" ;
крюк:крю́ м_d1_П2_К_ЧЬ "weight: 4.220579609520367" ;
кол:ко́л м_d1_П2_JPl "weight: 4.405012842684012" ;
копыл:копы́л м_b1_JPl ;
лист:ли́ст м_d1_JPl "weight: 5.156110394660814" ;
глазок:гла́з%^Fо́к м_d2 "weight: 4.5880909815324165" ;
корень:ко́р%^Fень м_e "weight: 4.79069259234085" ;
год: м_e_П2_год "weight: 6.309345013749061" ;
ветер:ве́т%^Fер м_e_П2 "weight: 5.319739500439413" ; ! [поэтич._также_м_1*c1,_П2_И.,_В._ед._поэт
волос:во́л м_e2_волос "weight: 5.277592909224202" ;
груздь:гру́здь м_f "weight: 3.4764302975773074" ;
опёнок:оп м_a_ёнок ;
пламень:пла́мень м_a_Nom/AccSgOnly "weight: 3.148725697149633" ; ! см._также_пла/мя
нети:не́ть мн._[м_a] ;
наручни:на́руч%^Fень мн._[м_a]_3 ;
зеленя:зелень мн._[м_b1] ;
понты:понт мн._[м_b] ;
коты:кот мн._[м_b]_3 ;
вини:ви́нь мн._[м_e] ;
спиричуэлс:спири́чуэлс мн._неод._0 ;
премиальные:премиа́льн мн._неод._[п_a] ;
радиопозывные:ра̀диопозывн мн._неод._[п_b] ;
командос:кома́ндос мн._одуш._0 ;
белые:бе́л мн._одуш._[п_a] ;
брачащиеся:бра́чащ мн._одуш._[п_a_R] ;
остальные:остальн мн._одуш._[п_b] ;
нефтедоллары:нѐфтедо́ллар мн._от_м_a ;
полдень: м_a_полдень "weight: 4.469856008398553" ;
